en: E100, Curcumin, Turmeric extract, curcuma extract, turmeric color
xx: E100
ar: E100, كركومين
bg: E100, куркумин
bs: E100, kurkumin
ca: E100, curcumina
cs: E100, kurkumin
da: E100, curcumin, gurkemejeekstrakt
de: E100, Kurkumin, Kurkumaextrakt
el: E100, κουρκουμινη
es: E100, curcumina, extracto de cúrcuma
et: E100, kurkumiin
fa: E100, کورکومین
fi: E100, kurkumiini, kurkumiinia, kurkumiiniuutetta
fr: E100, curcumine, extrait de curcuma
ga: E100, curcumina
he: E100, כורכומין
hr: E100, kurkumin, ekstrakt kurkume, curcumin
hu: E100, kurkumin
id: E100, kurkumin
it: E100, curcumina, estratto di curcuma
ja: E100, クルクミン
kn: E100, ಕರ್ಕ್ಯುಮಿನ್
ko: E100, 커큐민
lt: E100, kurkuminas
lv: E100, kurkumīns, kurkuma ekstrakts
mt: E100, kurkumina
nb: E100, kurkumin
nl: E100, curcumine, kurkuma extract, kurkuma-extract
pl: E100, kurkumina, ekstrakt z kurkumy, ekstrakt kurkumy, barwiący wyciąg z kurkumy, wyciąg z kurkumy
pt: E100, curcumina
ro: E100, curcumină
ru: E100, куркумины
sk: E100, kurkumín
sl: E100, kurkumin
sv: E100, kurkumin, gurkmejaextrakt
ta: E100, குர்க்குமின்
th: E100, เคอร์คูมิน
tr: E100, kurkumin
uk: E100, куркумін
vi: E100, curcumin
zh: E100, 姜黄素

en: E100(i)
xx: E100(i)

en: E100(ii)
xx: E100(ii)

en: E106, flavin mononucleotide
xx: E106
bg: E106, флавин мононуклеотид
cs: E106, flavinmononukleotid
da: E106, flavinmononukleotid
de: E106, Flavinmononukleotid
el: E106, φλαβίνη μονονουκλεοτίδιο
es: E106, flavín mononucleótido
et: E106, flavinmononukleotiid
fi: E106, flavinmononukleotidi
fr: E106, flavine mononucléotide
hu: E106, flavin-mononukleotid
it: E106, flavina mononucleotide
lt: E106, flavinmononukleotidas
lv: E106, flavīnmononukleotīds
mt: E106, flavin mononukleotid
nl: E106, flavinmononucleotide
pl: E106, Mononukleotyd flawinowy, flawinomononukleotyd
pt: E106, Mononucleótido de flavina
ro: E106, flavin mononucleotid
sk: E106, flavínmononukleotid
sl: E106, flavinmononukleotid
sv: E106, FMN

en: E101, Riboflavin, Vitamin B2, Flavaxin, Vitamin B 2, Vitamin G, Riboflavine, Lactoflavine, Lactoflavin, riboflavin color
xx: E101, 3a825i, 3a825ii, 3a825
bg: E101, Рибофлавин
ca: E101, Riboflavina
cs: E101, Riboflavin, Ovoflavin, Vitamin B 2, Vitamin B2, Laktoflavin, Vitamín G, Lactoflavin
da: E101, Riboflavin, Vitamin B2, Vitamin B 2, Vitamin G, Lactoflavin
de: E101, Riboflavin, Vitamin B2, Vitamin G, Lactoflavin, Laktoflavin
el: E101, ριβοφλαβίνη, βιταμίνη Β2
es: E101, Riboflavina, Vitamina B2, Lactoflavina
et: E101, Vitamiin B2, B2-vitamiin, Laktoflaviin, Riboflaviin
fi: E101, Riboflaviini, B2-vitamiini, Laktoflaviini, Riboflaviinia, B2-vitamiinia, Laktoflaviinia
fr: E101, Riboflavine, vitamine B2, Bacillus subtilis
hr: E101, riboflavini, riboflavin
hu: E101, Riboflavin, Laktoflavin, B2-vitamin
it: E101, Riboflavina, Vitamina G, Vitamina B2, C17H20N4O6
lt: E101, Riboflavinas, Vitaminas G
lv: E101, B2 vitamīns, Riboflavīns
mt: E101, Riboflavina, Vitamina B2
nl: E101, Riboflavine, Vitamine B2, Lactoflavine
pl: E101, Witamina B2, Witamina G, Ryboflawina, Laktoflawina, Ryboflawiny
pt: E101, Riboflavina, Vitamina b2, Vitamina G
ro: E101, Riboflavină, Vitamina B2
sk: E101, Riboflavín, Vitamín G, Ovoflavín, Vitamín B2, Laktoflavín
sl: E101, Riboflavin, Vitamin B2
sv: E101, Riboflavin, Vitamin B2, B2-vitamin
tr: E101, Riboflavin, B2 Vitamini, B2 Vitamin, Vitamin B2, Laktoflavin

en: E101(i), Riboflavin, Vitamin B2
xx: E101(i)
bg: E101(i), Рибофлавин
ca: E101(i), Riboflavina
cs: E101(i), Riboflavin
da: E101(i), Riboflavin
de: E101(i), Riboflavin
el: E101(i), Ριβοφλαβινη
es: E101(i), Riboflavina, Vitamina B2
et: E101(i), Riboflaviin
fi: E101(i), Riboflaviini, B2-vitamiini, Riboflaviinia, B2-vitamiinia
fr: E101(i), Riboflavine
hu: E101(i), Riboflavin
it: E101(i), Riboflavina
lt: E101(i), Riboflavinas
lv: E101(i), Riboflavīns
mt: E101(i), Riboflavina
nl: E101(i), Riboflavine
pl: E101(i), Ryboflawina
pt: E101(i), Riboflavina
ro: E101(i), Riboflavină
sk: E101(i), Riboflavín
sl: E101(i), Riboflavin
sv: E101(i), Riboflavin

en: E101(ii), Riboflavin-5′-phosphate, phosphate lactoflavina
xx: E101(ii)
bg: E101(ii), Рибофлавин-5′-фосфат
ca: E101(ii), Riboflavina-5′-fosfat
cs: E101(ii), Riboflavin-5′-fosfát, Riboflavin-5′-fosforečnan
da: E101(ii), Riboflavin-5′-phosphat
de: E101(ii), Riboflavin-5′-phosphat
el: E101(ii), 5′-φωσφορικη ριβοφλαβινη
es: E101(ii), Riboflavina-5′-fosfato
et: E101(ii), Riboflaviin-5′-fosfaat
fi: E101(ii), Riboflaviini-5′-fosfaatti, Riboflaviini-5′-fosfaattia
fr: E101(ii), Riboflavine-5′-phosphate, Riboflavine-5-Sodium Phosphate, 5′-phosphate de riboflavine
hu: E101(ii), Riboflavin-5'-foszfát
it: E101(ii), Riboflavina-5′-fosfato
lt: E101(ii), Riboflavin-5′-fosfatas
lv: E101(ii), Riboflavīn-5′-fosfāts
mt: E101(ii), Riboflavina-5'-fosfat
nl: E101(ii), Riboflavine-5'-fosfaat
pl: E101(ii), Ryboflawiny-5′-fosforan
pt: E101(ii), Riboflavina-5′-fosfato
ro: E101(ii), Riboflavină-5′-fosfat, Riboflavin-5-sodiu fosfat
sk: E101(ii), Riboflavín–5′–fosfát
sl: E101(ii), Riboflavin-5'-fosfat
sv: E101(ii), Riboflavin-5′-fosfat

en: E101(iii), Riboflavin from Bacillus subtilis
xx: E101(iii)

en: E101(iv), Riboflavin from Ashbya gossypii
xx: E101(iv)

en: E101a, E101a food additive
xx: E101a
bg: E101a, E101a food additive
cs: E101a, E101a food additive
da: E101a, E101a food additive
de: E101a, 5'-Phosphat Natriumsalz der Riboflavin, Riboflavin-5'-phosphat-Natriumsalz
el: E101a, E101a food additive
es: E101a, 5'-fosfato de riboflavina sódica, riboflavina-5'-fosfato sódico
et: E101a, E101a food additive
fi: E101a, Flaviinimononukleotidi, Flaviinimononukleotidia, FMN
fr: E101a, 5'-phosphate sodique de riboflavine, phosphate-5' de riboflavine de sodium, sel monosodique de l'ester du phosphate-5' de riboflavine, sel monosodique de l'ester de phosphate de la vitamine B2, sel de l'ester monosodique de la riboflavine 5-monophosphatée
hr: E101a, natrijev riboflavin 5-fosfat
hu: E101a, E101a food additive
it: E101a, E101a food additive
lt: E101a, E101a food additive
lv: E101a, E101a food additive
mt: E101a, E101a food additive
nl: E101a, E101a food additive
pl: E101a, E101a food additive
pt: E101a, E101a food additive
ro: E101a, 5'-fosfat de riboflavină sodică, riboflavină-5'-fosfat sodic
sk: E101a, E101a food additive
sl: E101a, E101a food additive
sv: E101a, E101a food additive

en: E102, Tartrazine, Yellow 5, Yellow number 5, Yellow no 5, Yellow no5, FD&C Yellow 5, FD&C Yellow no 5, FD&C Yellow no5, FD and C Yellow no. 5, FD and C Yellow 5, Yellow 5 lake
xx: E102
bg: E102, Тартразин
ca: E102, Tartrazina
cs: E102, Tartrazin, FD&C žluť 5, E 102, Tartazin
da: E102, Tartrazin, E-102
de: E102, Tartrazin, Yellow 5, E 102
el: E102, Ταρτραζινη
es: E102, Tartrazina, Tartracina, Yellow 5, Amarillo 5, E-102, amarillo ocaso FCF, amarillo FD&C 5
et: E102, Tartrasiin, E 102
fa: E102, تارترازین
fi: E102, Tartratsiini, Tartratsiinia, CI 19140, E 102
fr: E102, Tartrazine, FD&C Yellow 5, FD&C Jaune 5, Yellow 5, FD&C Yellow #5, C.I. Food Yellow 4, C.I. Acid Yellow 23, Acid Yellow 23, C.I. 19140, Yellow number 5, E-102, 1934-21-0
ga: E102, Tartraiséin
gl: E102, Tartrazina
he: E102, טרטרזין
hr: E102, Tartrazin
hu: E102, Tartrazin
id: E102, Tartrazina
it: E102, Tartrazina
ja: E102, タートラジン
ko: E102, 타트라진
lt: E102, Tartrazinas
lv: E102, Tartrazīns
mt: E102, Tartrażina
nb: E102, Tartrazin
nl: E102, Tartrazine
pl: E102, Tartrazyna
pt: E102, Tartarazina, Tartrazina, Corante amarelo tartrazina, Amarelo tartrazina
ro: E102, Tartrazină
ru: E102, Тартразин, Е102, Tartrazine
sh: E102, Tartrazin
si: E102, ටාට්‍රසින්
sk: E102, Tartrazín
sl: E102, Tartrazin
sr: Tartrazin
sv: E102, Tartrazin, E 102, Tartrasin
tr: E102, Tartrazin
uk: E102, Тартразин
zh: E102, :柠檬黄

en: E103, Alkannin
xx: E103
bg: E103, E103 food additive
ca: E103, Crisoína, crisoina
cs: E103, E103 food additive
da: E103, Alkannin
de: E103, Alkannin, Krisoïn
el: E103, E103 food additive
es: E103, Crisoína, Alcanina, Amarillo de alcanina, Amarillo de alcannina
et: E103, E103 food additive
fi: E103, Krysoiini S, resorsiininkeltainen, tropaeoliini
fr: E103, Jaune chrysoïne, Alkannine, jaune chrysoïne S, Chrysoïne S, Orcanette, Orcanete, CI rouge naturel 20, extrait d'Alkannet, crisoine, Alkannin, CI Natural Red 20, Alkanet extract, Chrysoineresorcinol, jaune de résorcinol, jaune d'or, T jaune, orange acide 6, résorcinol de Chrysoine
hu: E103, Alkannin, Krizoin
it: E103, Alcannina
lt: E103, E103 food additive
lv: E103, E103 food additive
mt: E103, E103 food additive
nl: E103, Alkannin
pl: E103, Alkanina
pt: E103, amarelo de alcanaína
ro: E103, Alcanet, Alkanet
sk: E103, E103 food additive
sl: E103, E103 food additive
sv: E103, Alkannin

en: E104, Quinoline yellow, Quinoline Yellow WS, C.I. 47005, Food Yellow 13
xx: E104
bg: E104, Хинолин жълто
ca: E104, Groc de Quinoleína, groc de quinoleina
cs: E104, Chinolinová žluť, Potravinářská žluť 13, E 104, Chinolinová žluť WS, Cl 47005
da: E104, Quinolingult
de: E104, Chinolingelb, E 104
el: E104, Κιτρινο κινολινης
es: E104, Amarillo de quinoleína, E 104, Amarillo de quinolina
et: E104, Kinoliinkollane
fi: E104, Kinoliinikeltainen, Kinoliinikeltainen WS, CI 47005
fr: E104, Jaune de quinoléine, colorant alimentaire jaune CI n°13, CI 47005
hu: E104, Kinolinsárga
it: E104, Giallo chinolina
lt: E104, Chinolino geltonasis
lv: E104, Hinolīna dzeltenais
mt: E104, Isfar tal-kinolin
nl: E104, Chinolinegeel, Chinoline Geel
pl: E104, Żółcień chinolinowa
pt: E104, Amarelo de quinoleína
ro: E104, Galben de chinolină
sk: E104, Chinolínová žltá
sl: E104, Kinolinsko rumeno
sv: E104, Kinolingult, E 104

en: E105, Fast Yellow AB
xx: E105
bg: E105, E105 food additive
ca: E105, Groc sòlid, groc solid
cs: E105, E105 food additive
da: E105, E105 food additive
de: E105, Festgelb AB
el: E105, E105 food additive
es: E105, Amarillo sólido, Amarillo sólido AB
et: E105, E105 food additive
fi: E105, Nopea keltainen AB
fr: E105, Jaune solide
hu: E105, Fast Yellow AB
it: E105, E105 food additive
lt: E105, E105 food additive
lv: E105, E105 food additive
mt: E105, E105 food additive
nl: E105, Resorcinolgeel (verboden)
pl: E105, Żółcień trwała AB
pt: E105, E105 food additive
ro: E105, Galben puternic AB, Rapid galben AB
sk: E105, E105 food additive
sl: E105, E105 food additive
sv: E105, E105 food additive

en: E107, Yellow 2G
xx: E107
bg: E107, Жълто 2G
cs: E107, Žlutý 2G
da: E107, Gul 2G
de: E107, Gelb 2G
el: E107, Κίτρινο 2G
es: E107, Amarillo 2G, Amarillo alimentario 5
et: E107, Kollane 2G
fi: E107, Keltainen 2G, CI 18965
fr: E107, Jaune 2G
hu: E107, Sárga 2G, Yellow 2G
it: E107, Giallo 2G
lt: E107, Geltonasis 2G
lv: E107, Dzeltenais 2G
mt: E107, Isfar 2G
nl: E107, Geel 2G, CI 18965
pl: E107, Żółcień 2G, Żółty 2G
pt: E107, Amarelo 2G
ro: E107, Galben 2G
sk: E107, Žltý 2G
sl: E107, Rumeno 2G
sv: E107, Gul 2G

en: E110, Sunset yellow FCF, CI Food Yellow 3, Orange Yellow S, FD&C Yellow 6, FD & C Yellow No.6, FD and C Yellow No. 6, Yellow No.6, Yellow 6, FD and C Yellow 6, C.I. 15985, Yellow 6 lake, Sunset Yellow
xx: E110
bg: E110, Сънсет жълто FCF, CI хранително жълто 3, Yellow 6
ca: E110, Groc ataronjat S
cs: E110, Sunset yellow FCF, Yellow 6, Žluť SY, E 110
da: E110, Sunset yellow FCF, Yellow 6
de: E110, Gelborange S, Food Yellow 3, Gelborange-S, Sunsetgelb FCF, Yellow 6, Gelborange
el: E110, Κιτρινο sunset FCF, Κίτρινο CI food 3, Yellow 6
es: E110, Amarillo anaranjado s, CI food yellow 3, Yellow 6, Amarillo crepúsculo, C.I. 15985, Amarillo ocaso, E 110, amarillo FD&C 6, amarillo 6
et: E110, Päikeseloojangukollane FCF, CI kollane toiduvärv 3, Yellow 6
fi: E110, Paraoranssi, Oranssi S, Sunset yellow FCF, Yellow 6, E 110, CI 15985
fr: E110, Jaune orangé S, Jaune soleil FCF, Sunset yellow FCF, C16H10N2Na2O7S2, C16H10N2Ca2O7S2, C16H10N2K2O7S2, CI 15985, C.I. 15985, 6-hydroxy-5-[(4-sulfonatophényl)azo]naphtalène-2-sulfonate de disodium, C.I. Food Yellow 3, CAS 2783-94-0, SEL DISODIQUE DE L'ACIDE HYDROXY-6 ((SULFOPHENYL-4)AZO)-5 NAPHTALENE SULFONIQUE-2, Gelborange S, 2-Hydroxy-1-(4-Sulfonato-Phenylazo)-6-Naphthalin-Sulfonat, Sunset Yellow, Sunset Yellow FCF, FD & C Yellow No.6, FD and C Yellow No. 6, 6-hydroxy-5-((p-sulfophenyl)azo)-2-naphthalenesulfonic acid disodium salt, 6-Hydroxy-5-(4-sulfophenylazo)-2-naphthalenesulfonic acid trisodium salt, Gelborange-S, Sunsetgelb FCF, 6-Hydroxy-5-(4-sulfophenylazo)-naphthalin- 2-sulfonsäure-Dinatriumsalz, Amarillo crepúsculo, Amarillo ocaso, Amarillo n° 6, Zonnegeel FCF, Oranjegeel S, Crelborange S, Colorant alimentaire jaune CI n°3, Yellow No.6, Yellow 6, 2783-94-0, Jaune orangé, Jaune orange
hr: E110
hu: E110, Sunset yellow FCF, sunset yellow, Narancssárga FCF, CI Food Yellow 3, Yellow 6
it: E110, Giallo tramonto FCF, CI giallo per alimenti 3, Yellow 6, Giallo arancio S
lt: E110, Saulėlydžio geltonasis FCF, Maistinis geltonasis CI Nr. 3, Yellow 6
lv: E110, Saulrieta dzeltenais FCF, CI Pārtikas dzeltenais 3, Yellow 6
mt: E110, Sunset yellow FCF, Yellow 6
nl: E110, Zonnegeel FCF, CI Food Yellow 3, Yellow 6, Geeloranje S
pl: E110, Żółcień pomarańczowa FCF, CI żółcień spożywcza 3, Yellow 6, Żółcień pomarańczowa S
pt: E110, Amarelo-sol FCF, Amarelo alimentar CI 3, Yellow 6, Amarelo crepúsculo
ro: E110, Apus galben FCF, Colorant alimentar galben CI 3, Yellow 6, Portocaliu galben S
ru: E110, Желтый солнечный закат
sk: E110, Žltá FCF, CI potravinárska žltá 3, Yellow 6, Žltá SY, Oranžová žltá, Žlť SY, Žltooranžová S, Žlť-oranž S, Žlť SY FCF, C.I. 15985, Žlť FCF, Oranžová žlť, Žltá SY FCF, Pomarančovožltá S
sl: E110, Sončno rumeno FCF, CI Food Yellow 3, Yellow 6
sv: E110, Para-orange, CI Food Yellow 3, Yellow 6, E 110

en: E111, Orange GGN, Alpha-naphthol, Alpha-naphtol, alpha-naphthol orange
xx: E111
bg: E111, Оранжев GGN, Алфа-нафтол, Алфа-наптол, оранжев нафтол
ca: E111, Taronja GGN, Alfa-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, taronja naftol
cs: E111, Oranžový GGN, Alfa-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, oranžový naftol
da: E111, Orange GGN, Alpha-naphthol, Alpha-naphtol, orange naftol
de: E111, Orange GGN, Alpha-Naphthol, Alpha-Naphtol, orange Naphthol
el: E111, Πορτοκαλί GGN, Άλφα-ναφθόλη, Άλφα-ναφτόλη, πορτοκαλί ναφθόλη
es: E111, Naranja GGN, Alfa-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, naranja naftol
et: E111, Oranž GGN, Alfa-naftool, Alpha-naphtol, oranž naftool
fi: E111, Oranssi GGN, Alfa-naftoli, Alpha-naphtol, oranssi naftoli
fr: E111, Orange GGN, Alpha-naphtol, Alpha-naphtol, orange naphtol
hu: E111, Orange GGN, Alpha-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, narancssárga naftol
it: E111, Arancione GGN, Alfa-naftolo, Alpha-naphtol, arancione naftolo
lt: E111, Oranžinė GGN, Alfa-naftolis, Alpha-naphtol, oranžinė naftolis
lv: E111, Oranžs GGN, Alfa-naftols, Alpha-naphtol, oranžs naftols
mt: E111, Oranġjo GGN, Alfa-naptol, Alpha-naphtol, oranġjo naptol
nl: E111, Oranje GGN, Alfa-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, oranje naftol
pl: E111, Oranż GGN, Pomarańczowy GGN, Alfa-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, pomarańczowy naftol
pt: E111, Laranja GGN, Alfa-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, laranja naftol
ro: E111, Portocaliu alfa-naftol, Portocaliu GGN, Alfa-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, portocaliu naftol
sk: E111, Oranžový GGN, Alfa-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, oranžový naftol
sl: E111, Oranžna GGN, Alfa-naftol, Alpha-naphtol, oranžna naftol
sv: E111, Orange GGN, Alpha-naphthol, Alpha-naphtol, orange naftol

en: E120, Cochineal, carminic acid, carmines, Natural Red 4, Cochineal Red
xx: E120
be: E120, Кармін
bg: E120, Кохинил, карминова киселина, кармини, кармин
bs: E120, Karmin
ca: E120, Carmí, Cotxinilla, àcid carmí, àcid carmínic, carmi, acid carmi
cs: E120, Košenila, kyselina karmínová, karmíny
da: E120, karminer, Carminer, carminsyre, cochenille
de: E120, echtes Karmin, Karminsäure, Carminsäure
el: E120, Κοχενιλη, καρμινικο οξυ, καρμινες
eo: E120, karmino
es: E120, Cochinilla, ácido carmínico, carmines, carmín cochinilla, carmín
et: E120, Košenill, karmiinhape, karmiinid, karmiinhape
eu: E120, Gorrimin
fi: E120, Karmiinit, Kokkiniili, karmiinihappo, Karmiini, Karmiinia, Karmiineja, Kokkiniiliä, karmiinihappoa, CI 75470
fr: E120, Acide carminique, carmin, carmins, Rouge cochenille, cochenille, Carmine, Crimson Lake, Cochineal, Natural Red 4, C.I. 75470, Rouge naturel CI n°4, 1260-17-9, carmin de cochenille
he: E120, קרמין
hr: E120, karmin
hu: E120, Kosnil, kárminsav, kárminok, Kárminvörös
hy: E120, Կարմին
ia: E120, carmin
io: E120, Karmino
it: E120, Cocciniglia, acido carminico, vari tipi di carminio, C22H20O13
ja: E120, コチニール色素, コチニール, カルミン酸色素
ky: E120, Кармин
lt: E120, Košenilis, karmino rūgštis, karminai
lv: E120, Košenils, karmīnskābe, karmīni
mk: E120, кармин
mt: E120, Kuċċinilja, aċidu karminiku, karminji
nb: E120, karmin
nl: E120, Cochenille, karmijnzuur, karmijn
oc: E120, Carmin
pl: E120, Koszenila, kwas karminowy, karminy, Koszelina, Karmina, karmin
pt: E120, Cochonilha, ácido carmínico, carminas
ro: E120, Coșenilă, acid carminic, carmine, Acidului carminic, carmin
ru: E120, Кошениль, карминовая кислота, кармин, кармины
sh: E120, Carmine
sk: E120, Košenila, kyselina karmínová, karmíny
sl: E120, Košenilja, karminska kislina, karmini, karmin
sv: E120, Karmin, karminsyra, E 120
th: E120, ชาดลิ้นจี่
tr: E120, Karmin
uk: E120, Кармін
vi: E120, Đỏ yên chi
zh: E120, 胭脂红

en: E121, Citrus Red 2
xx: E121
bg: E121, Цитрусово червено 2
ca: E121, Vermell cítric 2
cs: E121, Citrusová červená 2
da: E121, Citrus Rød 2
de: E121, Zitrusrot 2
el: E121, Κίτρινο κόκκινο 2
es: E121, Rojo cítrico 2, Rojo cítrico 2
et: E121, Tsitruseline punane 2
fi: E121, Sitruspunainen 2, Sitruspunainen 2
fr: E121, Rouge citrus no.2, Rouge citrus n°2, Rouge citrique n°2, Rouge citrique n°2, Rouge citrique n°2
hu: E121, Citromvörös 2
it: E121, Rosso agrumi 2
lt: E121, Citrinų raudonas 2
lv: E121, Citrusa sarkans 2
mt: E121, Ħamra ċitri 2
nl: E121, Citrusrood 2
pl: E121, Lakmus, Czerwień cytrusowa 2
pt: E121, Vermelho cítrico 2
ro: E121, Colorant citric roşu, Roșu citric 2
sk: E121, Citrusová červená 2
sl: E121, Citrusno rdeče 2
sv: E121, Citrusröd 2

en: E122, Azorubine, carmoisine, Food Red 3, Brillantcarmoisin O, Acid Red 14, Azorubin S, C.I. 14720
xx: E122
bg: E122, Азорубин, кармоизин
ca: E122, Azorrubina
cs: E122, Azorubín, carmoisin, Karmoisin, E 122
da: E122, Azorubin (carmoisin), Azorubin, Carmoisin, E-122
de: E122, Azorubin (carmoisin), Azorubin, Carmoisin, E 122
el: E122, Αζωρουμπινη, καρμοϊσινη, Αζορουμπίνη, Kαρμοϊζίνη
es: E122, Azorrubina, carmoisina, Acid Red 14, C.I. 14720, E 122, Food Red 3, Azorubina S, Brillantcarmoisin O, Carmisina
et: E122, Asorubiin, karmoisiin
fi: E122, Atsorubiini, Karmosiini, Atsorubiinia, Karmosiinia, Azorubine, carmoisine, CI 14720, E 122
fr: E122, Azorubine carmoisine, Azorubine, CI 14720, E-122, Carmoisine, 3567-69-9
hr: E122
hu: E122, Azorubin, karmazsin
it: E122, Azorubina, carmoisina, C20H12N2Na2O7S2
lt: E122, Azorubinas, karmuazinas, Karmoizinas
lv: E122, Azorubīns, karmoizīns
mt: E122, Ażorubina, karmoisina
nl: E122, Azorubine, karmozijn, CI 14720
pl: E122, Azorubina, karmoizyna
pt: E122, Azorubina, carmosina, Azorrubina
ro: E122, Azorubină, Carmoizină
sk: E122, Azorubín, karmoizín
sl: E122, Azorubin, karmoizin
sv: E122, Azorubin, karmosin, E 122